District of Columbia statutes.
41-114

Gift certificates and credit memos.

(a)

Gift certificates and credit memos held or owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business that have remained unclaimed by the owner for more than 5 years after becoming payable or distributable are presumed abandoned.

(b)

If a gift certificate or credit memo is redeemable for cash or merchandise, its value for purposes of this chapter shall be the amount paid by the purchaser.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 114, 27 DCR 5150
Sept. 29, 1992, D.C. Law 9-161, § 2(k), 39 DCR 5696

History

1981 Ed., § 42-214.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 14 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).

Editor's Notes